Alaska statutes. Title 4. Alcoholic Beverages.
Article 2. Penalties and Forfeitures.

Sec. 04.16.180.
Penalties for violation.

Except as provided in AS

04.11.015

,

04.11.150(g)

, AS

04.16.025

,

04.16.050

,

04.16.051

,

04.16.200

—

04.16.210

, and AS

04.21.065

, a person who violates a provision of this title or a regulation adopted by the board is guilty, upon conviction, of a class A misdemeanor. Each violation is a separate offense.

A suspension or revocation of a license ordered by the board under AS

04.11.370(a)(4)

and (5) shall be as follows:

on first conviction the license of the premises involved may not be revoked, but may be suspended for not more than 45 days;

on second conviction the license of the premises involved may not be revoked, but may be suspended for not more than 90 days;

on third conviction the license of the premises involved may be suspended or revoked.

This section does not affect the authority of the board to suspend or revoke a license when the board determines that continuance of activities under a license would not be in the best interests of the public.

In addition to other penalties provided in this chapter, the court may require a person convicted of an offense under this chapter who was less than 21 years of age at the time the person committed the offense to pay for and enroll in a juvenile alcohol safety action program if one is available.

In this section, the terms “second conviction” and “third conviction” include only convictions for violations that occur within five years of the first conviction. The terms refer to the cumulative number of convictions of a licensee of any combination of violations of the provisions of this title, regulations adopted under this title, or ordinances adopted under AS

04.21.010

. The terms “second conviction” and “third conviction” include a conviction of the agent or employee of a licensee of a violation of a law, regulation, or ordinance if the conviction constitutes a ground for suspension or revocation under AS

04.11.370(a)(5)

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 10 ch 156 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 81 SLA 1989; am § 2 ch 46 SLA 1994; am § 2 ch 81 SLA 1995; am § 36 ch 101 SLA 1995; am § 3 ch 65 SLA 2001; am § 13 ch 25 SLA 2007; am § 3 ch 86 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (e) was enacted as (c) and relettered in 2012, at which time subsections (d) and (e) were relettered as (c) and (d), respectively.

Sec. 04.16.180.
Penalties for violation.

[Repealed, § 164 ch 8 SLA 2022.]

A suspension or revocation of a license ordered by the board under AS

04.11.370(a)(4)

and (5) shall be as follows:

on first conviction, the license of the premises involved may not be revoked, but, except as provided in AS

04.16.030

and

04.16.052

, may be suspended for not more than 45 days;

on second conviction, the license of the premises involved may not be revoked, but may be suspended for not more than 90 days;

on third conviction, the license of the premises involved may be suspended or revoked.

This section does not affect the authority of the board to suspend or revoke a license when the board determines that continuance of activities under a license would not be in the best interests of the public.

[Repealed, § 164 ch 8 SLA 2022.]

In this section,

“conviction” includes a conviction of a violation, a misdemeanor, and a felony;

“second conviction” and “third conviction” include only convictions for violations that occur within five years after the first conviction; the terms refer to the cumulative number of convictions of a licensee of any combination of violations of the provisions of this title, regulations adopted under this title, or ordinances adopted under AS

04.21.010

; “second conviction” and “third conviction” include a conviction of the agent or employee of a licensee of a violation of a law, regulation, or ordinance if the conviction constitutes a ground for suspension or revocation under AS

04.11.370(a)(5)

.

In addition to the criminal penalties specified in this title and AS 12.55, a holder of a license under this title who is convicted of a crime or offense involving the violation of a provision of this title or a regulation adopted under this title is subject to suspension or revocation of the license under this section and other administrative penalties imposed by the board. For purposes of administrative penalties under this subsection, each violation is a separate offense.

The holder of a license subject to suspension or revocation under (b)(2) or (3) of this section may request a hearing to petition the board to reduce the administrative penalty. The board may reduce the administrative penalty if the licensee shows, by a preponderance of the evidence, that

the licensee complied with the alcohol server education course requirement of AS

04.21.025

and adopted and enforced a compliance program and a disciplinary program for agents and employees of the licensee;

the licensee has a pattern and practice of exercising the degree of care required under AS

04.16.030

;

the licensee posted warning signs as required under AS

04.21.065

; and

in the case of a conviction for a violation of AS

04.16.030

or

04.16.052

, the agent or employee convicted under AS 04.16.030 or

04.16.052

completed an alcohol server education course under AS

04.21.025

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 10 ch 156 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 81 SLA 1989; am § 2 ch 46 SLA 1994; am § 2 ch 81 SLA 1995; am § 36 ch 101 SLA 1995; am § 3 ch 65 SLA 2001; am § 13 ch 25 SLA 2007; am § 3 ch 86 SLA 2010; am § 128 ch 8 SLA 2022; am § 129 ch 8 SLA 2022; am § 130 ch 8 SLA 2022; am § 164 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.16.200.
Penalties for violations of AS 04.11.010 and 04.11.499.

Except as provided under (b) of this section, a person who violates AS

04.11.010

is, upon conviction, guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

A person who violates AS

04.11.010

in an area that has adopted a local option under AS

04.11.491

is, upon conviction, guilty of a class C felony.

It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution under (a) of this section that no profit was involved in the solicitation or receipt of an order for the delivery of an alcoholic beverage. However, the affirmative defense created under this subsection is not available in a prosecution of a person charged with selling or offering for sale alcoholic beverages to a person under 21 years of age.

Upon conviction of a person of a violation under (a) of this section, the court shall impose a minimum sentence of imprisonment of not less than 10 consecutive days. The execution of the sentence may not be suspended and probation or parole may not be granted until the minimum imprisonment provided in this subsection has been served. Imposition of sentence may not be suspended except upon the condition that the defendant be imprisoned for no less than the minimum period provided in this subsection.

A person who sends, transports, or brings alcoholic beverages into a municipality or established village in violation of AS

04.11.499(a)

is, upon conviction,

except as provided in (3) of this subsection, guilty of a class A misdemeanor if the quantity of alcoholic beverages is less than 10 and one-half liters of distilled spirits or 24 liters of wine, or either a half-keg of malt beverages or 12 gallons of malt beverages in individual containers;

guilty of a class C felony if the quantity of alcoholic beverages is 10 and one-half liters or more of distilled spirits or 24 liters or more of wine, or either a half-keg of malt beverages or 12 gallons or more of malt beverages in individual containers; or

guilty of a class C felony if the quantity of alcoholic beverages is less than 10 and one-half liters of distilled spirits or 24 liters of wine, or either a half-keg of malt beverages or 12 gallons of malt beverages in individual containers and the person has been previously convicted under this subsection or (b) of this section two or more times within 15 years of the date of the present offense.

A person who purchases alcohol in violation of AS

04.11.499(b)

is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

Upon conviction of a class A misdemeanor under (e)(1) of this section, the court

shall impose a minimum sentence of imprisonment of

not less than 72 consecutive hours and a fine of not less than $1,500 if the person has not been previously convicted;

not less than 20 days and a fine of not less than $3,000 if the person has been previously convicted once;

not less than 60 days and a fine of not less than $4,000 if the person has been previously convicted twice and is not subject to punishment under (h) of this section;

not less than 120 days and a fine of not less than $5,000 if the person has been previously convicted three times and is not subject to punishment under (h) of this section;

not less than 240 days and a fine of not less than $6,000 if the person has been previously convicted four times and is not subject to punishment under (h) of this section;

not less than 360 days and a fine of not less than $7,000 if the person has been previously convicted more than four times and is not subject to punishment under (h) of this section;

may not

suspend execution of sentence or grant probation except on the condition that the person

serve the minimum imprisonment under (1) of this subsection; and

pay the minimum fine required under (1) of this subsection; or

suspend imposition of sentence.

Upon conviction of a class C felony under (b) or (e)(2) or (3) of this section, the court

shall impose a fine of not less than $10,000 and a minimum sentence of imprisonment of

120 days if the person has not been previously convicted;

240 days if the person has been previously convicted once;

360 days if the person has been previously convicted two or more times;

may not

suspend execution of sentence or grant probation except on the condition that the person

suspend imposition of sentence.

In (g) of this section, “previously convicted” means having been convicted, within the 15 years preceding the date of the present offense, of an offense under (b) or (e) of this section or a law or ordinance of another jurisdiction having elements similar to those offenses.

serve the minimum imprisonment under (1) of this subsection; and

In (h) of this section, “previously convicted” means having been convicted, within the 15 years preceding the date of the present offense, of a felony offense under (b) or (e) of this section or a law or ordinance of another jurisdiction having elements similar to those felony offenses.

The court shall consider the date of a previous conviction as occurring on the date that sentence is imposed for the prior offense.

(ii)

pay the minimum fine required under (1) of this subsection; or

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980; am §§ 12, 13 ch 109 SLA 1983; am §§ 1, 2 ch 27 SLA 1988; am §§ 37, 38 ch 101 SLA 1995; am § 8 ch 63 SLA 2001; am §§ 14, 15 ch 25 SLA 2007; am §§ 8, 9 ch 75 SLA 2008; am §§ 6, 7 ch 88 SLA 2010)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 44, ch. 75, SLA 2008 explicitly declares that § 8, ch. 75, SLA 2008, amending (e) of this section, and § 9, ch. 75, SLA 2008, enacting (g)-(k) of this section, are subject to severability as authorized by AS

01.10.030

.

Sec. 9, ch. 88, SLA 2010, provides that the 2010 amendment of (h) of this section applies “to an offense occurring on or after June 17, 2010” and that “[r]eferences to previous convictions [in (h) of this section] apply to convictions occurring before, on, or after June 17, 2010.”

Sec. 04.16.205.
Penalties for violations of AS 04.11.501 and related ordinances.

A person who possesses alcoholic beverages in a municipality or established village in violation of AS

04.11.501

or an ordinance adopted under AS

04.11.501

may, upon conviction, be punished by a fine not to exceed $1,000 and shall forfeit the seized alcoholic beverages. When a peace officer stops or contacts a person concerning a violation of AS 04.11.501 or an ordinance adopted under AS 04.11.501, the peace officer shall seize the alcoholic beverages and may issue a citation to the person as provided in AS

12.25.175

—

12.25.230

.

If a person cited for a violation of AS

04.11.501

or an ordinance adopted under AS

04.11.501

for which a bail amount has been established under (c) of this section does not contest the citation, the person may, within 30 days after the date the citation is issued,

mail or personally deliver to the clerk of the court in which the citation is filed by the peace officer the amount of bail indicated on the citation and a copy of the citation indicating that the right to an appearance is waived, a plea of no contest is entered, and the bail and all alcoholic beverages seized are forfeited; or

perform community work in lieu of payment of the fine or a portion of the fine as provided in (d) of this section.

The supreme court shall establish by rule or order a schedule of bail amounts that may be forfeited without a court appearance for a violation of AS

04.11.501

or an ordinance adopted under AS

04.11.501

. In establishing the bail schedule the supreme court may consider the quantity of alcoholic beverages possessed and the number of prior violations of the person cited. Before establishing or amending the schedule of bail amounts required by this subsection, the supreme court shall appoint and consult with an advisory committee consisting of the following seven persons: one superior court judge, one magistrate from each judicial district in the state, a representative of the Department of Law, and a representative of the Public Defender Agency. The maximum bail amount may not exceed $1,000, and the issuing officer shall write on the citation the amount of bail applicable to the violation.

Community work shall be performed at the direction of the local governing body of the municipality or the local governing body of the established village. In the absence of a local governing body for an established village, community work shall be performed at the direction of the body that has traditionally performed public functions on behalf of the entire community. The value of community work in lieu of a fine is $5.00 per hour. When the community work is completed, the person cited for the violation shall mail or personally deliver to the clerk of the court in which the citation is filed by the peace officer

a form, prescribed by the administrative director of the Alaska Court System, indicating completion of the community work; and

a copy of the citation, indicating that the right to an appearance is waived, a plea of no contest is entered, and that the bail is forfeited or community work has been performed and that all alcoholic beverages seized are forfeited.

When bail has been forfeited or proof of performance of community work under this section has been filed with the court, a judgment shall be entered. Forfeiture of bail or filing proof of performance of community work and forfeiture of all seized items is a complete satisfaction for the violation. The clerk of court accepting the bail or the form indicating performance of community work shall provide the offender with a receipt stating that fact, if requested.

A person cited under this section is guilty of failure to obey a citation under AS

12.25.230

if the person fails to pay the fine, appear in court as required, or provide proof of performance to the court as specified in (d)(1) of this section.

Notwithstanding other provisions of law, if a person cited for a violation of AS

04.11.501

or an ordinance adopted under AS

04.11.501

for which a bail amount has been established under (c) of this section appears in court and is found guilty, the penalty that is imposed for the offense may not exceed the bail amount for that offense established under (c) of this section.

A violation of AS

04.11.501

or an ordinance adopted under AS

04.11.501

may not be considered a criminal offense and may not result in imprisonment, nor is a fine imposed for a violation considered criminal punishment. A person cited for a violation does not have a right to a jury trial or court appointed counsel.

[Repealed, § 60 ch 29 SLA 2010.]

[Repealed, § 60 ch 29 SLA 2010.]

History.

(§ 4 ch 80 SLA 1986; am §§ 39 — 44 ch 101 SLA 1995; am §§ 1 — 3, 60 ch 29 SLA 2010)

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 61, ch. 29, SLA 2010, the 2010 amendments to (a), (b), and (f) of this section apply “to all citations issued . . . for violations occurring on or after July 1, 2010.”

Sec. 04.16.210.
Penalty for making false statement.

If a false statement is made in an application under AS

04.11.260

—

04.11.290

, the applicant is guilty of perjury and, upon conviction, is subject to the penalty provided by law for the crime of perjury under AS

11.56.200

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 17 ch 28 SLA 1981)

Sec. 04.16.210.
Penalty for making false statement.

History.

[§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 17 ch 28 SLA 1981; Repealed, § 164 ch 8 SLA 2022.]

Sec. 04.16.220.
Forfeitures and seizures.

The following are subject to forfeiture:

alcoholic beverages manufactured, sold, offered for sale, possessed for sale, or bartered or exchanged for goods and services in this state in violation of AS

04.11.010

; alcoholic beverages possessed, stocked, warehoused, or otherwise stored in violation of AS

04.21.060

; alcoholic beverages sold or offered for sale in violation of a local option adopted under AS

04.11.491

; alcoholic beverages transported into the state and sold to persons not licensed under this chapter in violation of AS

04.16.170(b)

; alcoholic beverages transported in violation of AS

04.16.125

;

materials and equipment used in the manufacture, sale, offering for sale, possession for sale, or barter or exchange of alcoholic beverages for goods and services in this state in violation of AS

04.11.010

; materials and equipment used in the stocking, warehousing, or storage of alcoholic beverages in violation of AS

04.21.060

; materials and equipment used in the sale or offering for sale of an alcoholic beverage in an area in violation of a local option adopted under AS

04.11.491

;

aircraft, vehicles, or vessels used to transport or facilitate the transportation of

alcoholic beverages manufactured, sold, offered for sale, possessed for sale, or bartered or exchanged for goods and services in this state in violation of AS 04.11.010;

property stocked, warehoused, or otherwise stored in violation of AS 04.21.060;

alcoholic beverages imported into a municipality or established village in violation of AS

04.11.499(a)

;

alcoholic beverages found on licensed premises that do not bear federal excise stamps if excise stamps are required under federal law;

alcoholic beverages, materials, or equipment used in violation of AS

04.16.175

;

money, securities, negotiable instruments, or other things of value used in financial transactions or items of value purchased from the proceeds derived from activity prohibited under AS 04.11.010 or in violation of a local option adopted under AS 04.11.491;

a firearm used in furtherance of a violation of this title.

Property subject to forfeiture under this section may be actually or constructively seized under an order issued by the superior court upon a showing of probable cause that the property is subject to forfeiture under this section. Constructive seizure is effected upon posting a signed notice of seizure on the item to be forfeited, stating the violation and the date and place of seizure. Seizure without a court order may be made if

the seizure is incident to a valid arrest or search;

the property subject to seizure is the subject of a prior judgment in favor of the state; or

there is probable cause to believe that the property is subject to forfeiture under (a) of this section; except for alcoholic beverages possessed on violation of AS

04.11.501

or an ordinance adopted under AS

04.11.501

, property seized under this paragraph may not be held over 48 hours or until an order of forfeiture is issued by the court, whichever is earlier.

Within 30 days after a seizure under this section, the Department of Public Safety shall make reasonable efforts to ascertain the identity and whereabouts of any person holding an interest or an assignee of a person holding an interest in the property seized, including a right to possession, lien, mortgage, or conditional sales contract. The Department of Public Safety shall notify the person ascertained to have an interest in property seized of the impending forfeiture, and, before forfeiture, the Department of Law shall publish, once a week for four consecutive calendar weeks, a notice of the impending forfeiture in a newspaper of general circulation in the judicial district in which the seizure was made or, if no newspaper is published in that judicial district, in a newspaper published in the state and distributed in that judicial district. Upon service or publication of notice of commencement of a forfeiture action under this section, a person claiming an interest in the property shall file, within 30 days after the service or publication, a notice of claim setting out the nature of the interest, the date it was acquired, the consideration paid, and an answer to the state’s allegations. If a claim and answer is not filed within the time specified, the property described in the state’s allegation must be ordered forfeited to the state without further proceedings or showings. Questions of fact or law raised by a notice of forfeiture action and answer of a claimant in an action commenced under this section must be determined by the court sitting without a jury. This proceeding may be held in abeyance until conclusion of any pending criminal charges against the claimant under this title.

Property subject to forfeiture under (a) of this section may be forfeited

upon conviction of a person for a violation of AS

04.11.010

,

04.11.499

, AS

04.16.125

, AS

04.21.060

, or AS

04.11.501

or an ordinance adopted under AS

04.11.501

; or

upon judgment by the superior court in a proceeding in rem that the property was used in a manner subjecting it to forfeiture under (a) of this section.

The owner of property subject to forfeiture under (a) or (i) of this section is entitled to relief from the forfeiture in the nature of remission of the forfeiture if, in an action under (d) of this section, the owner shows that the owner

was not a party to the violation;

had no actual knowledge or reasonable cause to believe that the property was used or was to be used in violation of the law; and

had no actual knowledge or reasonable cause to believe that the person committing the violation had

a criminal record for violating this title; or

committed other violations of this title.

A person other than the owner holding, or the assignee of, a lien, mortgage, conditional sales contract on, or the right to possession to property subject to forfeiture under (a) or (i) of this section is entitled to relief from the forfeiture in the nature of remission of the forfeiture if, in an action under (d) of this section, the person shows that the person

was not a party to the violation subjecting the property to forfeiture;

had no actual knowledge or reasonable cause to believe that the property was to be used in violation of the law; and

had no actual knowledge or reasonable cause to believe that the person committing the violation had

a criminal record for violating this title; or

committed other violations of this title.

It is no defense in an in rem forfeiture proceeding brought under (d)(2) of this section that a criminal proceeding is pending or has resulted in conviction or acquittal of a person charged with violating AS

04.11.010

,

04.11.499

, or AS

04.21.060

.

Alcoholic beverages forfeited under (d) of this section shall be placed in the custody of a peace officer of the state and destroyed no later than 30 days after forfeiture. All other property forfeited under this section shall be placed in the custody of the commissioner of public safety for disposition according to an order entered by the court. The court shall order destroyed any property forfeited under this section that is harmful to the public and shall order any property forfeited under this section that was seized in a municipality to be transferred to the municipality in which the property was seized. Other property shall be ordered sold and the proceeds used for payment of expenses of the proceedings for forfeiture and sale, including expenses of seizure, custody, and court costs. The remainder of the proceeds shall be deposited in the general fund.

Upon conviction for a violation of AS

04.11.010

or

04.11.499(a)

, if an aircraft, vehicle, or watercraft is subject to forfeiture under (a) of this section, the court shall, subject to remission to innocent parties under this section,

order the forfeiture of an aircraft to the state;

order the forfeiture of a vehicle or watercraft if

the defendant has a prior felony conviction for a violation of AS 11.41 or a similar law in another jurisdiction;

the defendant is on felony probation or parole;

the defendant has a prior conviction for violating AS

04.11.010

or

04.11.499(a)

; or

the quantity of alcohol transported in violation of this title was twice the presumptive amounts in AS

04.11.010(c)

.

Notwithstanding (i) of this section, a court is not required to order the forfeiture of a vehicle or watercraft if the court determines that

the vehicle or watercraft is the sole means of transportation for a family residing in a village;

the court may impose conditions that will prevent the defendant’s use of the vehicle or watercraft; and

either

a member of the family would be entitled to remission under this section if the family member were an owner of or held a security interest in the vehicle or watercraft; or

if a member of the family would not be entitled to remission, the family member was unable as a practical matter to stop the violation making the vehicle or watercraft subject to forfeiture.

When forfeiting property under (a), (d), or (i) of this section, a court may award to a municipal law enforcement agency that participated in the arrest or conviction of the defendant, the seizure of property, or the identification of property for seizure, (1) the property if the property is worth $5,000 or less and is not money or some other thing that is divisible, or (2) up to 75 percent of the property or the value of the property if the property is worth more than $5,000 or is money or some other thing that is divisible. In determining the percentage a municipal law enforcement agency may receive under this subsection, the court shall consider the municipal law enforcement agency’s total involvement in the case relative to the involvement of the state.

In this section, “village” means a community of fewer than 1,000 persons located off the interconnected state road system.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980; am §§ 5 — 8 ch 80 SLA 1986; am §§ 45 — 49 ch 101 SLA 1995; am §§ 8 — 11 ch 124 SLA 2004; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 17 SLA 2006; am §§ 16, 17 ch 25 SLA 2007)

Sec. 04.16.220.
Forfeitures and seizures.

The following are subject to forfeiture:

alcoholic beverages manufactured, sold, offered for sale, possessed for sale, or bartered or exchanged for goods and services in this state in violation of AS

04.09.060

,

04.09.850

, or AS

04.11.010

; alcoholic beverages possessed, stocked, warehoused, or otherwise stored in violation of AS

04.21.060

; alcoholic beverages sold or offered for sale in violation of a local option adopted under AS

04.11.491

; alcoholic beverages transported into the state and sold to persons not licensed under this title in violation of AS

04.16.170(b)

; alcoholic beverages transported in violation of AS

04.09.750

or AS

04.16.125

;

materials and equipment used in the manufacture, sale, offering for sale, possession for sale, or barter or exchange of alcoholic beverages for goods and services in this state in violation of AS

04.09.060

,

04.09.850

, or AS

04.11.010

; materials and equipment used in the stocking, warehousing, or storage of alcoholic beverages in violation of AS

04.21.060

; materials and equipment used in the sale or offering for sale of an alcoholic beverage in an area in violation of a local option adopted under AS

04.11.491

;

aircraft, vehicles, or vessels used to transport or facilitate the transportation of

alcoholic beverages manufactured, sold, offered for sale, possessed for sale, or bartered or exchanged for goods and services in this state in violation of AS 04.09.060, 04.09.850, or AS 04.11.010;

property stocked, warehoused, or otherwise stored in violation of AS 04.21.060;

alcoholic beverages imported into a municipality or established village in violation of AS

04.11.499(a)

;

alcoholic beverages found on licensed premises that do not bear federal excise stamps if excise stamps are required under federal law;

alcoholic beverages, materials, or equipment used in violation of AS

04.16.175

;

money, securities, negotiable instruments, or other things of value used in financial transactions or items of value purchased from the proceeds derived from activity prohibited under AS 04.09.060, 04.09.850, or AS 04.11.010 or in violation of a local option adopted under AS 04.11.491;

a firearm used in furtherance of a violation of this title.

Property subject to forfeiture under this section may be actually or constructively seized under an order issued by the superior court upon a showing of probable cause that the property is subject to forfeiture under this section. Constructive seizure is effected upon posting a signed notice of seizure on the item to be forfeited, stating the violation and the date and place of seizure. Seizure without a court order may be made if

the seizure is incident to a valid arrest or search;

the property subject to seizure is the subject of a prior judgment in favor of the state; or

there is probable cause to believe that the property is subject to forfeiture under (a) of this section; except for alcoholic beverages possessed on violation of AS

04.11.501

or an ordinance adopted under AS

04.11.501

, property seized under this paragraph may not be held over 48 hours or until an order of forfeiture is issued by the court, whichever is earlier.

Within 30 days after a seizure under this section, the Department of Public Safety shall make reasonable efforts to ascertain the identity and whereabouts of any person holding an interest or an assignee of a person holding an interest in the property seized, including a right to possession, lien, mortgage, or conditional sales contract. The Department of Public Safety shall notify the person ascertained to have an interest in property seized of the impending forfeiture, and, before forfeiture, the Department of Law shall publish, once a week for four consecutive calendar weeks, a notice of the impending forfeiture in a newspaper of general circulation in the judicial district in which the seizure was made or, if no newspaper is published in that judicial district, in a newspaper published in the state and distributed in that judicial district. Upon service or publication of notice of commencement of a forfeiture action under this section, a person claiming an interest in the property shall file, within 30 days after the service or publication, a notice of claim setting out the nature of the interest, the date it was acquired, the consideration paid, and an answer to the state’s allegations. If a claim and answer is not filed within the time specified, the property described in the state’s allegation must be ordered forfeited to the state without further proceedings or showings. Questions of fact or law raised by a notice of forfeiture action and answer of a claimant in an action commenced under this section must be determined by the court sitting without a jury. This proceeding may be held in abeyance until conclusion of any pending criminal charges against the claimant under this title.

Property subject to forfeiture under (a) of this section may be forfeited

upon conviction of a person for a violation of AS

04.09.060

,

04.09.750

,

04.09.850

, AS

04.11.010

,

04.11.499

, AS

04.16.125

, AS

04.21.060

, or AS

04.11.501

or an ordinance adopted under AS

04.11.501

; or

upon judgment by the superior court in a proceeding in rem that the property was used in a manner subjecting it to forfeiture under (a) of this section.

The owner of property subject to forfeiture under (a) or (i) of this section is entitled to relief from the forfeiture in the nature of remission of the forfeiture if, in an action under (d) of this section, the owner shows that the owner

was not a party to the violation;

had no actual knowledge or reasonable cause to believe that the property was used or was to be used in violation of the law; and

had no actual knowledge or reasonable cause to believe that the person committing the violation had

a criminal record for violating this title; or

committed other violations of this title.

A person other than the owner holding, or the assignee of, a lien, mortgage, conditional sales contract on, or the right to possession to property subject to forfeiture under (a) or (i) of this section is entitled to relief from the forfeiture in the nature of remission of the forfeiture if, in an action under (d) of this section, the person shows that the person

was not a party to the violation subjecting the property to forfeiture;

had no actual knowledge or reasonable cause to believe that the property was to be used in violation of the law; and

had no actual knowledge or reasonable cause to believe that the person committing the violation had

a criminal record for violating this title; or

committed other violations of this title.

It is no defense in an in rem forfeiture proceeding brought under (d)(2) of this section that a criminal proceeding is pending or has resulted in conviction or acquittal of a person charged with violating AS

04.09.060

,

04.09.850

, AS

04.11.010

,

04.11.499

, or AS

04.21.060

.

Alcoholic beverages forfeited under (d) of this section shall be placed in the custody of a peace officer of the state and destroyed no later than 30 days after forfeiture. All other property forfeited under this section shall be placed in the custody of the commissioner of public safety for disposition according to an order entered by the court. The court shall order destroyed any property forfeited under this section that is harmful to the public and shall order any property forfeited under this section that was seized in a municipality to be transferred to the municipality in which the property was seized. Other property shall be ordered sold and the proceeds used for payment of expenses of the proceedings for forfeiture and sale, including expenses of seizure, custody, and court costs. The remainder of the proceeds shall be deposited in the general fund.

Upon conviction for a violation of AS

04.09.060

,

04.09.850

, AS

04.11.010

, or

04.11.499(a)

, if an aircraft, vehicle, or watercraft is subject to forfeiture under (a) of this section, the court shall, subject to remission to innocent parties under this section,

order the forfeiture of an aircraft to the state;

order the forfeiture of a vehicle or watercraft if

the defendant has a prior felony conviction for a violation of AS 11.41 or a similar law in another jurisdiction;

the defendant is on felony probation or parole;

the defendant has a prior conviction for violating AS

04.11.010

or

04.11.499(a)

; or

the quantity of alcohol transported in violation of this title was twice the presumptive amounts in AS

04.11.010(c)

.

Notwithstanding (i) of this section, a court is not required to order the forfeiture of a vehicle or watercraft if the court determines that

the vehicle or watercraft is the sole means of transportation for a family residing in a village;

the court may impose conditions that will prevent the defendant’s use of the vehicle or watercraft; and

either

a member of the family would be entitled to remission under this section if the family member were an owner of or held a security interest in the vehicle or watercraft; or

if a member of the family would not be entitled to remission, the family member was unable as a practical matter to stop the violation making the vehicle or watercraft subject to forfeiture.

When forfeiting property under (a), (d), or (i) of this section, a court may award to a municipal law enforcement agency that participated in the arrest or conviction of the defendant, the seizure of property, or the identification of property for seizure, (1) the property if the property is worth $5,000 or less and is not money or some other thing that is divisible, or (2) up to 75 percent of the property or the value of the property if the property is worth more than $5,000 or is money or some other thing that is divisible. In determining the percentage a municipal law enforcement agency may receive under this subsection, the court shall consider the municipal law enforcement agency’s total involvement in the case relative to the involvement of the state.

In this section, “village” means a community of fewer than 1,000 persons located off the interconnected state road system.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980; am §§ 5 — 8 ch 80 SLA 1986; am §§ 45 — 49 ch 101 SLA 1995; am §§ 8 — 11 ch 124 SLA 2004; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 17 SLA 2006; am §§ 16, 17 ch 25 SLA 2007; am § 131 ch 8 SLA 2022; am § 132 ch 8 SLA 2022; am § 133 ch 8 SLA 2022; am § 134 ch 8 SLA 2022)